Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.375

Washington history day program.

(1)(a) Effective July 1, 2018, responsibility for administering the Washington history day program is transferred from the Washington state historical society to the office of the superintendent of public instruction. In accordance with this subsection (1)(a), and subject to funds appropriated for this specific purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction is responsible for the administration and coordination of the Washington history day program, a program affiliated with the national history day organization, including providing necessary staff support.

(b) Subject to the requirements and limits of (a) of this subsection, the Washington history day program must be operated as a partnership between the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the Washington state historical society, and private parties interested in providing funding and in-kind support for the program. The Washington state historical society must, in coordination with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, promote the program and provide access and support for students who are conducting primary and secondary research of historical Washington state documents and commentary.

(2) The Washington history day account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. In collaboration with private and philanthropic partners, private matching funds will be procured to support Washington history day. All receipts from gifts, grants, or endowments from public or private sources must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the Washington history day program. Only the superintendent of public instruction or the superintendent's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

[ 2018 c 127 s 5.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2018 c 127: See note following RCW 28A.230.094.